Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6705
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 115.